Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.130

Limitation upon inquiry.

No court or judge shall inquire into the legality of any judgment or process whereby the party is in custody, or discharge the party when the term of commitment has not expired, in either of the cases following:

(1) Upon any process issued on any final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction except where it is alleged in the petition that rights guaranteed the petitioner by the Constitution of the state of Washington or of the United States have been violated and the petition is filed within the time allowed by RCW 10.73.090 and 10.73.100.

(2) For any contempt of any court, officer or body having authority in the premises to commit; but an order of commitment, as for a contempt upon proceedings to enforce the remedy of a party, is not included in any of the foregoing specifications.

(3) Upon a warrant issued from the superior court upon an indictment or information.

[ 1989 c 395 s 3; 1947 c 256 s 3; 1891 c 43 s 1; Code 1881 s 677; 1869 p 157 s 617; 1854 p 213 s 445; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 1075.]